Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1484
Rental deposit; how handled.

All rental deposits shall be held by the landlord for the tenant. Rental deposits may be held in a trust account, which may be a common trust account and which may be an interest-bearing account. Any interest earned on a rental deposit shall be the property of the landlord.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 35.